Illinois, session 104th, HB1170.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 6z-112 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/6z-112)7    Sec. 6z-112. The Cannabis Regulation Fund.8    (a) There is created the Cannabis Regulation Fund in the 9State treasury, subject to appropriations unless otherwise 10provided in this Section. All moneys collected under the 11Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act shall be deposited into the 12Cannabis Regulation Fund, consisting of taxes, license fees, 13other fees, and any other amounts required to be deposited or 14transferred into the Fund.15    (b) Whenever the Department of Revenue determines that a 16refund should be made under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax 17Act to a claimant, the Department of Revenue shall submit a 18voucher for payment to the State Comptroller, who shall cause 19the order to be drawn for the amount specified and to the 20person named in the notification from the Department of 21Revenue. This subsection (b) shall constitute an irrevocable 22and continuing appropriation of all amounts necessary for the 23payment of refunds out of the Fund as authorized under this   HB1170- 2 -LRB104 04964 LNS 14991 b1subsection (b).2    (c) On or before the 25th day of each calendar month, the 3Department of Revenue shall prepare and certify to the State 4Comptroller the transfer and allocations of stated sums of 5money from the Cannabis Regulation Fund to other named funds 6in the State treasury. The amount subject to transfer shall be 7the amount of the taxes, license fees, other fees, and any 8other amounts paid into the Fund during the second preceding 9calendar month, minus the refunds made under subsection (b) 10during the second preceding calendar month by the Department. 11The transfers shall be certified as follows:12        (1) The Department of Revenue shall first determine 13    the allocations which shall remain in the Cannabis 14    Regulation Fund, subject to appropriations, to pay for the 15    direct and indirect costs associated with the 16    implementation, administration, and enforcement of the 17    Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act by the Department of 18    Revenue, the Department of State Police, the Department of 19    Financial and Professional Regulation, the Department of 20    Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, the 21    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity, and the 22    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority.23        (1.5) After the allocations have been made as provided 24    in paragraph (1) of this subsection (c), the Department of 25    Revenue shall determine the allocation that shall remain 26    in the Cannabis Regulation Fund, subject to appropriation,   HB1170- 3 -LRB104 04964 LNS 14991 b1    to provide free community college tuition under Section 2    2-30 of the Public Community College Act. 3        (2) After the allocations have been made as provided 4    in paragraphs paragraph (1) and (1.5) of this subsection 5    (c), of the remainder of the amount subject to transfer 6    for the month as determined in this subsection (c), the 7    Department shall certify the transfer into the Cannabis 8    Expungement Fund 1/12 of the fiscal year amount 9    appropriated from the Cannabis Expungement Fund for 10    payment of costs incurred by State courts, the Attorney 11    General, State's Attorneys, civil legal aid, as defined by 12    Section 15 of the Public Interest Attorney Assistance Act, 13    and the Department of State Police to facilitate petitions 14    for expungement of Minor Cannabis Offenses pursuant to 15    Public Act 101-27, as adjusted by any supplemental 16    appropriation, plus cumulative deficiencies in such 17    transfers for prior months.18        (3) After the allocations have been made as provided 19    in paragraphs (1), (1.5), and (2) of this subsection (c), 20    the Department of Revenue shall certify to the State 21    Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall transfer the 22    amounts that the Department of Revenue determines shall be 23    transferred into the following named funds according to 24    the following:25            (A) 2% shall be transferred to the Drug Treatment 26        Fund to be used by the Department of Human Services   HB1170- 4 -LRB104 04964 LNS 14991 b1        for: (i) developing and administering a scientifically 2        and medically accurate public education campaign 3        educating youth and adults about the health and safety 4        risks of alcohol, tobacco, illegal drug use (including 5        prescription drugs), and cannabis, including use by 6        pregnant women; and (ii) data collection and analysis 7        of the public health impacts of legalizing the 8        recreational use of cannabis. Expenditures for these 9        purposes shall be subject to appropriations.10            (B) 8% shall be transferred to the Local 11        Government Distributive Fund and allocated as provided 12        in Section 2 of the State Revenue Sharing Act. The 13        moneys shall be used to fund crime prevention 14        programs, training, and interdiction efforts, 15        including detection, enforcement, and prevention 16        efforts, relating to the illegal cannabis market and 17        driving under the influence of cannabis.18            (C) 25% shall be transferred to the Criminal 19        Justice Information Projects Fund to be used for the 20        purposes of the Restore, Reinvest, and Renew Program 21        to address economic development, violence prevention 22        services, re-entry services, youth development, and 23        civil legal aid, as defined by Section 15 of the Public 24        Interest Attorney Assistance Act. The Restore, 25        Reinvest, and Renew Program shall address these issues 26        through targeted investments and intervention programs   HB1170- 5 -LRB104 04964 LNS 14991 b1        and promotion of an employment infrastructure and 2        capacity building related to the social determinants 3        of health in impacted community areas. Expenditures 4        for these purposes shall be subject to appropriations.5            (D) 20% shall be transferred to the Department of 6        Human Services Community Services Fund, to be used to 7        address substance abuse and prevention and mental 8        health concerns, including treatment, education, and 9        prevention to address the negative impacts of 10        substance abuse and mental health issues, including 11        concentrated poverty, violence, and the historical 12        overuse of criminal justice responses in certain 13        communities, on the individual, family, and community, 14        including federal, State, and local governments, 15        health care institutions and providers, and 16        correctional facilities. Expenditures for these 17        purposes shall be subject to appropriations.18            (E) 10% shall be transferred to the Budget 19        Stabilization Fund.20            (F) 35%, or any remaining balance, shall be 21        transferred to the General Revenue Fund.22    As soon as may be practical, but no later than 10 days 23after receipt, by the State Comptroller of the transfer 24certification provided for in this subsection (c) to be given 25to the State Comptroller by the Department of Revenue, the 26State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall   HB1170- 6 -LRB104 04964 LNS 14991 b1transfer the respective amounts in accordance with the 2directions contained in such certification.3    (d) On July 1, 2019 the Department of Revenue shall 4certify to the State Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall 5transfer $5,000,000 from the Compassionate Use of Medical 6Cannabis Fund to the Cannabis Regulation Fund.7    (e) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary and 8except as otherwise provided in this Section, this Fund is not 9subject to sweeps, administrative charge-backs, or any other 10fiscal or budgetary maneuver that would in any way transfer 11any amounts from this Fund into any other fund of the State.12    (f) The Cannabis Regulation Fund shall retain a balance of 13$1,000,000 for the purposes of administrative costs.14    (g) In Fiscal Year 2024 the allocations in subsection (c) 15of this Section shall be reviewed and adjusted if the General 16Assembly finds there is a greater need for funding for a 17specific purpose in the State as it relates to Public Act 18101-27.19(Source: P.A. 101-27, eff. 6-25-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 20    Section 10. The Public Community College Act is amended by 21adding Section 2-30 as follows: 22    (110 ILCS 805/2-30 new)23    Sec. 2-30. Free community college tuition in R3 Areas. The 24State Board shall develop and maintain a program to provide   HB1170- 7 -LRB104 04964 LNS 14991 b1free tuition at one community college in each R3 Area, as 2designated pursuant to Section 10-40 of the Cannabis 3Regulation and Tax Act, using money appropriated from the 4Cannabis Regulation Fund. The State Board shall provide the 5Department of Revenue with any information the Department 6requests concerning the costs of the program. The State Board 7may adopt any rules necessary for the purposes of this 8Section.